Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1008
Poultry; sale or delivery; false representations; penalty.

Any person selling, bartering or delivering poultry to such retail or wholesale dealer therein, who shall fail, refuse or neglect to furnish full, complete and truthful information for such a receipt as provided in section 69-1006 and shall render a false statement in such a receipt concerning who raised the poultry described therein, or where and from whom he secured such poultry, shall be guilty of a violation of the provisions of this section, and shall, for each separate offense, be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 414, § 8, p. 1281;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 132.